Wyoming, session 2025, HB0263.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 16-1-401 and 16-1-402 are created to
read:

ARTICLE 4
LOCAL WATER SYSTEM FUNDING
HB0263

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0640

16-1-401. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

(i) "Board" means the state loan and investment
board to include the office of state lands and investments;

(ii) "Program" means the local water system
funding program created by this article.

16-1-402. Local water system funding program;
creation; requirements; duties.

(a) The local water system funding program is created
to provide financial assistance to cities, towns and
special districts for improvements to community public
water systems and community wastewater systems in
accordance with this article.

(b) The state loan and investment board, with
assistance from the office of state lands and investments,
HB0263

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0640
shall administer the program. The board shall promulgate
all rules necessary to implement the program.

(c) The board shall:

(i) Establish an application process by which
cities, towns and special districts may apply for financial
assistance under the program;

(ii) Receive and review applications for
financial assistance under the program, in accordance with
subsection (f) of this section;

(iii) Administer the financial assistance
available under the program, including processing and
receiving repayments;

(iv) Conduct an annual audit of the program;

(v) Report to the joint appropriations committee
and the joint minerals, business and economic development
interim committee not later than November 1 of each year on
HB0263

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0640
the financial assistance provided under the program for the
immediately preceding fiscal year.

(d) Subject to subsection (e) of this section, funds
under the program shall be available only to cities, towns
and special districts for financial assistance for eligible
projects for the following purposes:

(i) Upfront predevelopment and preapplication
costs;

(ii) Planning and technical assistance;

(iii) Local matching funds;

(iv) Repayment of federal or state loans
received from other programs or funds;

(v) Costs related to joining a regional water
system or regional wastewater system.

(e) Projects shall be eligible for financial
assistance from the program only if the project is for a
HB0263

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0640
water system or wastewater system for which consumer rates
are charged in accordance with W.S. 15-7-407 and if the
project meets at least one (1) of the following:

(i) The project is an eligible project for
funding under the state water pollution control revolving
loan account, subject to the requirements of W.S. 16-1-201
through 16-1-207;

(ii) The project is an eligible project for
funding under the state drinking water revolving loan
account, subject to the requirements of W.S. 16-1-301
through 16-1-308;

(iii) The project under the Wyoming water
development office and is approved by the legislature;

(iv) The project is an eligible local government
capital construction project under W.S. 9-4-604(a).

(f) Upon receiving an application for financial
assistance under the program, the board shall review the
application to determine whether the application qualifies
HB0263

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0640
for the program in accordance with this article. Financial
assistance under the program shall be approved by majority
vote of the state loan and investment board. In reviewing
applications for the program, the board shall consider, at
a minimum, the following factors:

(i) Population of the city, town or special
district that has applied for financial assistance;

(ii) The ability of the city, town or special
district to pay for or repay funds for the project for
which financial assistance is sought under the program;

(iii) The level of existing consumer rates
charged by the city, town or special district and the
amount of funding reserves that the city, town or special
district has, in comparison to other cities, towns and
special districts;

(iv) The ability of the city, town or special
district to join a regional water system or regional
wastewater system;

HB0263

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0640
(v) The results and record of the city, town or
county based on the annual audit required under W.S.
9-1-507.

(g) A city, town or special district that receives
financial assistance under the program shall establish or,
if already established, maintain funds for depreciation in
accordance with W.S. 15-7-407(b).

(h) Funding for the program shall be from funds
borrowed under subsection (j) of this section and from any
other funds received by the board for the program.

(j) The board is authorized to borrow from the
legislative stabilization reserve account an amount not to
exceed fifty million dollars ($50,000,000.00) in any one
(1) fiscal year to provide financial assistance under the
program. The amounts borrowed under this section shall be
repaid from funds available from the annual distributions
to the legislative stabilization reserve account under W.S.
9-4-719(q). Interest on the unpaid balance shall be charged
and shall be equal to the rate of return earned on the
HB0263

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0640
legislative stabilization reserve account in the previous
fiscal year.

Section 2. W.S. 9-4-719(b)(intro) and (i) is amended
to read:

9-4-719. Investment earnings; spending policy;
permanent funds.

(b) There is created the permanent Wyoming mineral
trust fund reserve account. All funds within the account
shall be invested by the state treasurer as authorized
under W.S. 9-4-715(a), (d), (e) and (r) and all investment
earnings from the account shall be credited to the account.
Except for funds specified by the legislature that
guarantee the obligations of permanent Wyoming mineral
trust fund investment earnings and funds to be transferred
into the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund, funds
deposited into the reserve account created by this
subsection are intended to be inviolate and constitute a
permanent or perpetual trust fund. Beginning July 1, 2021
for fiscal year 2022 and each fiscal year thereafter, to
the extent funds are available, the state treasurer shall
HB0263

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0640
transfer unobligated funds from this account to the general
fund on a quarterly, pro-rata basis as necessary to ensure
that an amount equal to two and one-half percent (2.5%) of
the previous five (5) year average market value of the
permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund, calculated on the
first day of the fiscal year, is available for expenditure
during each fiscal year. As soon as possible after the end
of each of the fiscal years beginning on and after July 1,
2017, after making any transfer required pursuant to
paragraphs (i) and (ii) of this subsection, revenues in
this account in excess of two hundred forty-five percent
(245%) of the spending policy amount in subsection (d) of
this section shall be credited to the permanent Wyoming
mineral trust fund. For fiscal year 2020 2025 and for each
fiscal year thereafter:

(i) As soon as practicable after the end of the
fiscal year, after making any other transfers provided by
law from the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund reserve
account, but prior to calculating the balance of the
account under this subsection, the state treasurer shall
transfer from the account:

HB0263

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0640
(A) An amount equal to the difference
between the maximum amount which may be credited to the
strategic investments and projects account pursuant to
subsection (q) of this section and the amount actually
credited to that account in the applicable fiscal year;

(B) An amount equal to the difference
between the maximum amount that may be credited to the
legislative stabilization reserve account under subsection
(q) of this section and the amount actually credited to
that account in the applicable fiscal year.

Section 3. The state loan and investment board shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.

Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0263